Utah statutes.
53-11-122.   Requirements during search and seizure -- Notification of law enforcement agency.

A bail enforcement agent, bail recovery agent, or bail recovery apprentice shall observe the following requirements before taking action authorized under this chapter:

(1)  identify himself as a "bail enforcement agent," "bail recovery agent," or "bail recovery apprentice"; and

(2)  comply with the notification requirements of Section 53-11-123.

